Illinois, session 104th, HB1885.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by changing 5Section 13.2 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/13.2)  (from Ch. 127, par. 149.2)7    Sec. 13.2. Transfers among line item appropriations. 8    (a) Transfers among line item appropriations from the same 9treasury fund for the objects specified in this Section may be 10made in the manner provided in this Section when the balance 11remaining in one or more such line item appropriations is 12insufficient for the purpose for which the appropriation was 13made.14    (a-1) No transfers may be made from one agency to another 15agency, nor may transfers be made from one institution of 16higher education to another institution of higher education 17except as provided by subsection (a-4). 18    (a-2) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, 19transfers may be made only among the objects of expenditure 20enumerated in this Section, except that no funds may be 21transferred from any appropriation for personal services, from 22any appropriation for State contributions to the State 23Employees' Retirement System, from any separate appropriation   HB1885- 2 -LRB104 08943 HLH 18998 b1for employee retirement contributions paid by the employer, 2nor from any appropriation for State contribution for employee 3group insurance. 4    (a-2.5) (Blank). 5    (a-3) Further, if an agency receives a separate 6appropriation for employee retirement contributions paid by 7the employer, any transfer by that agency into an 8appropriation for personal services must be accompanied by a 9corresponding transfer into the appropriation for employee 10retirement contributions paid by the employer, in an amount 11sufficient to meet the employer share of the employee 12contributions required to be remitted to the retirement 13system.14    (a-4) Long-Term Care Rebalancing. The Governor may 15designate amounts set aside for institutional services 16appropriated from the General Revenue Fund or any other State 17fund that receives monies for long-term care services to be 18transferred to all State agencies responsible for the 19administration of community-based long-term care programs, 20including, but not limited to, community-based long-term care 21programs administered by the Department of Healthcare and 22Family Services, the Department of Human Services, and the 23Department on Aging, provided that the Director of Healthcare 24and Family Services first certifies that the amounts being 25transferred are necessary for the purpose of assisting persons 26in or at risk of being in institutional care to transition to   HB1885- 3 -LRB104 08943 HLH 18998 b1community-based settings, including the financial data needed 2to prove the need for the transfer of funds. The total amounts 3transferred shall not exceed 4% in total of the amounts 4appropriated from the General Revenue Fund or any other State 5fund that receives monies for long-term care services for each 6fiscal year. A notice of the fund transfer must be made to the 7General Assembly and posted at a minimum on the Department of 8Healthcare and Family Services website, the Governor's Office 9of Management and Budget website, and any other website the 10Governor sees fit. These postings shall serve as notice to the 11General Assembly of the amounts to be transferred. Notice 12shall be given at least 30 days prior to transfer. 13    (b) In addition to the general transfer authority provided 14under subsection (c), the following agencies have the specific 15transfer authority granted in this subsection:16    The Department of Healthcare and Family Services is 17authorized to make transfers representing savings attributable 18to not increasing grants due to the births of additional 19children from line items for payments of cash grants to line 20items for payments for employment and social services for the 21purposes outlined in subsection (f) of Section 4-2 of the 22Illinois Public Aid Code.23    The Department of Children and Family Services is 24authorized to make transfers not exceeding 2% of the aggregate 25amount appropriated to it within the same treasury fund for 26the following line items among these same line items: Foster   HB1885- 4 -LRB104 08943 HLH 18998 b1Home and Specialized Foster Care and Prevention, Institutions 2and Group Homes and Prevention, and Purchase of Adoption and 3Guardianship Services.4    The Department on Aging is authorized to make transfers 5not exceeding 10% of the aggregate amount appropriated to it 6within the same treasury fund for the following Community Care 7Program line items among these same line items: purchase of 8services covered by the Community Care Program and 9Comprehensive Case Coordination.10    The State Board of Education is authorized to make 11transfers from line item appropriations within the same 12treasury fund for General State Aid, General State Aid - Hold 13Harmless, and Evidence-Based Funding, provided that no such 14transfer may be made unless the amount transferred is no 15longer required for the purpose for which that appropriation 16was made, to the line item appropriation for Transitional 17Assistance when the balance remaining in such line item 18appropriation is insufficient for the purpose for which the 19appropriation was made.20    The State Board of Education is authorized to make 21transfers between the following line item appropriations 22within the same treasury fund: Disabled Student 23Services/Materials (Section 14-13.01 of the School Code), 24Disabled Student Transportation Reimbursement (Section 2514-13.01 of the School Code), Disabled Student Tuition - 26Private Tuition (Section 14-7.02 of the School Code),   HB1885- 5 -LRB104 08943 HLH 18998 b1Extraordinary Special Education (Section 14-7.02b of the 2School Code), Reimbursement for Free Lunch/Breakfast Program, 3Summer School Payments (Section 18-4.3 of the School Code), 4and Transportation - Regular/Vocational Reimbursement (Section 529-5 of the School Code). Such transfers shall be made only 6when the balance remaining in one or more such line item 7appropriations is insufficient for the purpose for which the 8appropriation was made and provided that no such transfer may 9be made unless the amount transferred is no longer required 10for the purpose for which that appropriation was made. 11    The Department of Healthcare and Family Services is 12authorized to make transfers not exceeding 4% of the aggregate 13amount appropriated to it, within the same treasury fund, 14among the various line items appropriated for Medical 15Assistance. 16    The Department of Central Management Services is 17authorized to make transfers not exceeding 2% of the aggregate 18amount appropriated to it, within the same treasury fund, from 19the various line items appropriated to the Department, into 20the following line item appropriations: auto liability claims 21and related expenses and payment of claims under the State 22Employee Indemnification Act.23    (c) The sum of such transfers for an agency in a fiscal 24year shall not exceed 2% of the aggregate amount appropriated 25to it within the same treasury fund for the following objects: 26Personal Services; Extra Help; Student and Inmate   HB1885- 6 -LRB104 08943 HLH 18998 b1Compensation; State Contributions to Retirement Systems; State 2Contributions to Social Security; State Contribution for 3Employee Group Insurance; Contractual Services; Travel; 4Commodities; Printing; Equipment; Electronic Data Processing; 5Operation of Automotive Equipment; Telecommunications 6Services; Travel and Allowance for Committed, Paroled and 7Discharged Prisoners; Library Books; Federal Matching Grants 8for Student Loans; Refunds; Workers' Compensation, 9Occupational Disease, and Tort Claims; Late Interest Penalties 10under the State Prompt Payment Act and Sections 368a and 370a 11of the Illinois Insurance Code; and, in appropriations to 12institutions of higher education, Awards and Grants. 13Notwithstanding the above, any amounts appropriated for 14payment of workers' compensation claims to an agency to which 15the authority to evaluate, administer and pay such claims has 16been delegated by the Department of Central Management 17Services may be transferred to any other expenditure object 18where such amounts exceed the amount necessary for the payment 19of such claims.20    (c-1) (Blank).21    (c-2) (Blank). 22    (c-3) (Blank). 23    (c-4) (Blank).24    (c-5) (Blank). 25    (c-6) (Blank). 26    (c-7) (Blank).   HB1885- 7 -LRB104 08943 HLH 18998 b1    (c-8) (Blank). 2    (c-9) (Blank). 3    (c-10) Special provisions for State fiscal year 2024. 4Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, for State 5fiscal year 2024, transfers among line item appropriations to 6a State agency from the same State treasury fund may be made 7for operational or lump sum expenses only, provided that the 8sum of such transfers for a State agency in State fiscal year 92024 shall not exceed 8% of the aggregate amount appropriated 10to that State agency for operational or lump sum expenses for 11State fiscal year 2024. For the purpose of this subsection, 12"operational or lump sum expenses" includes the following 13objects: personal services; extra help; student and inmate 14compensation; State contributions to retirement systems; State 15contributions to social security; State contributions for 16employee group insurance; contractual services; travel; 17commodities; printing; equipment; electronic data processing; 18operation of automotive equipment; telecommunications 19services; travel and allowance for committed, paroled, and 20discharged prisoners; library books; federal matching grants 21for student loans; refunds; workers' compensation, 22occupational disease, and tort claims; late interest penalties 23under the State Prompt Payment Act and Sections 368a and 370a 24of the Illinois Insurance Code; lump sum and other purposes; 25and lump sum operations. For the purpose of this subsection, 26"State agency" does not include the Attorney General, the   HB1885- 8 -LRB104 08943 HLH 18998 b1Comptroller, the Treasurer, or the judicial or legislative 2branches. 3    (c-11) Special provisions for State fiscal year 2025. 4Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, for State 5fiscal year 2025, transfers among line item appropriations to 6a State agency from the same State treasury fund may be made 7for operational or lump sum expenses only, provided that the 8sum of such transfers for a State agency in State fiscal year 92025 shall not exceed 4% of the aggregate amount appropriated 10to that State agency for operational or lump sum expenses for 11State fiscal year 2025. For the purpose of this subsection, 12"operational or lump sum expenses" includes the following 13objects: personal services; extra help; student and inmate 14compensation; State contributions to retirement systems; State 15contributions to social security; State contributions for 16employee group insurance; contractual services; travel; 17commodities; printing; equipment; electronic data processing; 18operation of automotive equipment; telecommunications 19services; travel and allowance for committed, paroled, and 20discharged prisoners; library books; federal matching grants 21for student loans; refunds; workers' compensation, 22occupational disease, and tort claims; late interest penalties 23under the State Prompt Payment Act and Sections 368a and 370a 24of the Illinois Insurance Code; lump sum and other purposes; 25and lump sum operations. For the purpose of this subsection, 26"State agency" does not include the Attorney General, the   HB1885- 9 -LRB104 08943 HLH 18998 b1Comptroller, the Treasurer, or the judicial or legislative 2branches. 3    (c-12) Beginning in State fiscal year 2026, transfers 4among line item appropriations to a State agency from the same 5State treasury fund shall not exceed 1% of the aggregate 6amount appropriated to that State agency for the same category 7of appropriation. Moneys appropriated to a State agency as a 8result of grants, reimbursements, or matching funds received 9from an outside party, including, but not limited to, the 10federal government, may not be transferred to a different line 11item appropriation or to a different State agency. 12    (d) Transfers among appropriations made to agencies of the 13Legislative and Judicial departments and to the 14constitutionally elected officers in the Executive branch 15require the approval of the officer authorized in Section 10 16of this Act to approve and certify vouchers. Transfers among 17appropriations made to the University of Illinois, Southern 18Illinois University, Chicago State University, Eastern 19Illinois University, Governors State University, Illinois 20State University, Northeastern Illinois University, Northern 21Illinois University, Western Illinois University, the Illinois 22Mathematics and Science Academy and the Board of Higher 23Education require the approval of the Board of Higher 24Education and the Governor. Transfers among appropriations to 25all other agencies require the approval of the Governor.26    The officer responsible for approval shall certify that   HB1885- 10 -LRB104 08943 HLH 18998 b1the transfer is necessary to carry out the programs and 2purposes for which the appropriations were made by the General 3Assembly and shall transmit to the State Comptroller a 4certified copy of the approval which shall set forth the 5specific amounts transferred so that the Comptroller may 6change his records accordingly. The Comptroller shall furnish 7the Governor with information copies of all transfers approved 8for agencies of the Legislative and Judicial departments and 9transfers approved by the constitutionally elected officials 10of the Executive branch other than the Governor, showing the 11amounts transferred and indicating the dates such changes were 12entered on the Comptroller's records.13    (e) The State Board of Education, in consultation with the 14State Comptroller, may transfer line item appropriations for 15General State Aid or Evidence-Based Funding among the Common 16School Fund and the Education Assistance Fund, and, for State 17fiscal year 2020 and each fiscal year thereafter, the Fund for 18the Advancement of Education. With the advice and consent of 19the Governor's Office of Management and Budget, the State 20Board of Education, in consultation with the State 21Comptroller, may transfer line item appropriations between the 22General Revenue Fund and the Education Assistance Fund for the 23following programs:24        (1) Disabled Student Personnel Reimbursement (Section 25    14-13.01 of the School Code);26        (2) Disabled Student Transportation Reimbursement   HB1885- 11 -LRB104 08943 HLH 18998 b1    (subsection (b) of Section 14-13.01 of the School Code);2        (3) Disabled Student Tuition - Private Tuition 3    (Section 14-7.02 of the School Code);4        (4) Extraordinary Special Education (Section 14-7.02b 5    of the School Code);6        (5) Reimbursement for Free Lunch/Breakfast Programs;7        (6) Summer School Payments (Section 18-4.3 of the 8    School Code);9        (7) Transportation - Regular/Vocational Reimbursement 10    (Section 29-5 of the School Code);11        (8) Regular Education Reimbursement (Section 18-3 of 12    the School Code); and13        (9) Special Education Reimbursement (Section 14-7.03 14    of the School Code). 15    (f) For State fiscal year 2020 and each fiscal year 16thereafter, the Department on Aging, in consultation with the 17State Comptroller, with the advice and consent of the 18Governor's Office of Management and Budget, may transfer line 19item appropriations for purchase of services covered by the 20Community Care Program between the General Revenue Fund and 21the Commitment to Human Services Fund.22    (g) For State fiscal year 2024 and each fiscal year 23thereafter, if requested by an agency chief executive officer 24and authorized and approved by the Comptroller, the 25Comptroller may direct and the Treasurer shall transfer funds 26from the General Revenue Fund to fund payroll expenses that   HB1885- 12 -LRB104 08943 HLH 18998 b1meet the payroll transaction exception criteria as defined by 2the Comptroller in the Statewide Accounting Management System 3(SAMS) Manual. The agency shall then transfer these funds back 4to the General Revenue Fund within 7 days. 5(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 6103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-588, eff. 6-5-24.) 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.